California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(B) Any funds recouped from those counties electing to establish a 15 percent reserve pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 16934.2.

(C) Funds retained by the department pursuant to subdivision (a).

(D) Interest earnings on funds.

(E) Any additional funds appropriated by the Legislature.

(2) Funds deposited in the CHDP Treatment Account shall be administered on an accrual basis and notwithstanding any other provision of law, except as provided in this chapter, shall not be transferred to any other fund or account except for purposes of investment as provided in Article 4 (commencing with Section 16470) of Chapter 3 of Part 2 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(3) Moneys deposited into the account shall constitute a risk pool which shall be used for any or all of the following purposes:

(A) Payment for services provided pursuant to Section 16934 in counties which have contracted with the department pursuant to subdivision (a).

(B) State administrative costs, including any costs associated with a contract for processing claims.

(C) If the projected expenditure of funds from the CHDP Treatment Account for any fiscal year exceeds available revenues, the department may adjust payments for the remainder of the fiscal year to providers on a pro rata basis in order to ensure that expenditures do not exceed available revenues.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 577, Sec. 23.   Effective October 13, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

16934.7.

(a) For the 1990–91 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, each county entering into a contract with the department pursuant to Section 16934.5, in which the department assumed the responsibility of payment for the treatment of children pursuant to Section 16934, shall have the option to contract with the department to administer the distribution and monitoring of funds allocated from the Hospital Services Account in the fund pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 16946.

(b) Any county which does not elect to contract with the department pursuant to Section 16934.5 for payment for the treatment of children pursuant to Section 16934 may contract with the department to administer that portion of its funds allocated to the county from the Hospital Services Account in the fund pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 16946, but shall not contract with the department to administer that portion of its funds allocated to the county from the Hospital Services Account in the fund pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 16946.

(c) (1) Any county intending to contract with the department pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b) shall submit to the department a notice of intent to contract by resolution adopted by the board of supervisors or authorized persons within 45 days after the effective date of the act adding this section.

(2) For each fiscal year following the submission of the notice of intent to contract pursuant to paragraph (1), the county board of supervisors shall submit a notice adopted by the board of supervisors to the department, in accordance with procedures established by the department, no later than April 1 of the fiscal year preceding the fiscal year for which the intended agreement will be in effect.

(d) (1) Each county contracting with the department pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b) shall agree that the department shall retain that portion of the county’s allocation pursuant to subdivision (b) or paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 16946, whichever is applicable.

(2) The department may use up to 10 percent of the amount of funds retained pursuant to paragraph (1) for purposes of administration of this section.

(e) As a condition of any contract entered into pursuant to this section, the department shall act on behalf of the county and shall assume all program responsibilities for distribution and monitoring funds pursuant to subdivision (b) or paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 16946, whichever is applicable. The department may exercise discretion in the administration of funds pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 16946 and shall also implement subdivisions (d), (e), (f), and (g) of Section 16946 with regard to those funds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 430, Sec. 9.   Effective July 26, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

16935.

(a) A county that is eligible to participate in the CMSP pursuant to Section 16809 may elect to have the state administer its physician services account. Each county that is eligible to participate in the CMSP pursuant to Section 16809 and that elects to have the state administer its physician services account shall do all of the following:

(1) Enter into a contract with the department to administer its county physician services account.

(2) Authorize the department to act on its behalf and to assume all responsibilities for the distribution and monitoring of funds in its physician services account pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 16952.

(3) Agree to comply with uniform policies, procedures, and program standards, including, but not limited to, eligibility levels established mutually by the department and the participating counties.

(4) Transfer funds allocated to the county for purposes of the county physician services account, less any funds retained pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 16934.5 to the department under such conditions as the department may require.

(b) The department may use funds retained or transferred to it by the county pursuant to this subdivision for purposes of administering the county’s physician services account in accordance with Sections 16952 to 16958, inclusive.

(c) For the 1989–90 fiscal year, any county which intends to contract with the department for the administration of moneys allocated from the Physician Services Account in the fund pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 16952 shall submit, to the department, a notice of intent to contract which has been adopted by the county board of supervisors, not later than November 15, 1989.

(d) For the 1990–91 fiscal year and subsequent fiscal years, any county which intends to contract with the department for the administration of moneys allocated from the Physician Services Account in the fund shall submit to the department a notice of intent to contract, which has been adopted by the county board of supervisors, not later than April 1 of the fiscal year preceding the fiscal year for which the contract will be in effect and in accordance with procedures established by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 577, Sec. 24.   Effective October 13, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

16935.5.

The department may administer the distribution and monitoring of funds allocated from the Hospital Services Account pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 16946 and from the Physician Services Account pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 16952, less funds retained by the department for the administration of the children’s treatment program pursuant to Section 16934, for any county that is eligible to participate in the CMSP pursuant to Section 16809 that does not apply for, or rescinds its application for, funds under this chapter. Allocations for a particular county shall generally be utilized for payments to eligible providers in that county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 577, Sec. 25.   Effective October 13, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

16936.

(a) (1) Any county that requests funds under this chapter shall submit to the department, for approval by the department, an application for initial funding and a description of the proposed use and expenditure of the moneys, as a component of the county health services plan and budget submitted pursuant to Section 16800. The department shall review and approve this information for compliance with this part.

(2) Beginning in the 1990–91 fiscal year, any county which does not contract with the department pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 16934.5 shall include in the application an estimate of the costs and funding arrangement for dental services.

(b) The department shall review each county’s application and proposed use of funds for compliance with this chapter.

(c) The department shall make initial monthly payments upon approval of the county’s request for funds containing assurances that the county will comply with this chapter and other applicable provisions of this part.

(d) Payments made beyond April 15, 1990, and February 1 of each subsequent fiscal year, shall be contingent upon the signing of an agreement between the county board of supervisors and the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 195, Sec. 38.   Effective July 12, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

16937.

(a) Services, associated costs, and sociodemographic characteristics of persons served by each county under Section 17000 and supported in whole or in part by funds appropriated for purposes of this chapter shall be incorporated into the information required pursuant to Section 16915.

(b) Not later than July 1, 1991, to the extent possible, each county shall incorporate the data required by Section 16915 in the reports specified in subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 195, Sec. 39.   Effective July 12, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

16938.

(a) Each county shall submit a report of expenditures and other information to the department according to the procedures established by the department.

(b) The department shall review the reports submitted pursuant to subdivision (a) and recoup unspent moneys and expenditures that are not in compliance with this chapter or the requirements established by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 195, Sec. 40.   Effective July 12, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

16939.

As a condition of receiving funds pursuant to this chapter, each county shall meet the requirements of Articles 6 (commencing with Section 16980), 7 (commencing with Section 16990) and 10 (commencing with Section 16995) of Chapter 5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 430, Sec. 11.   Effective July 26, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. California Healthcare for Indigents Program [16940. - 16995.1.]



  ARTICLE 1. General [16940. - 16942.]

16940.

(a) The department shall, each fiscal year, determine the percentage of moneys appropriated for the purposes of this chapter. For the 1989–90 fiscal year, these percentages shall be 59.5 percent from the Hospital Services Account, 12.2 percent from the Physician Services Account, and 28.3 percent from the Unallocated Account. These percentages shall be applied as specified in this chapter.

(b) (1) There is, in the County Health Services Fund, the California Health Care for the
 Indigent Program Account.

(2) For purposes of this chapter, “CHIP Account” means the account created by this section.

(3) The following amounts shall be deposited in the CHIP Account:

(A) Moneys appropriated for the purpose of this chapter.

(B) Any moneys appropriated by the Legislature to the CHIP Account.

(c) Moneys deposited in the CHIP Account shall be administered on an accrual basis and notwithstanding any other provision of law, except as provided in this chapter, shall not be transferred to any other fund or account except for purposes of investment as provided in Article 4 (commencing with Section 16470) of Chapter 3 of Part 2 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government
 Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1331, Sec. 9.   Effective October 2, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

16941.

(a) The amount appropriated and available for the purposes of this chapter shall be allocated to each MISP county in accordance with the ratios established in subdivision (b).

(b) Allocations shall be made to each county by multiplying the amount appropriated for the purposes of this chapter by each percentage listed below:CountyCHIP AllocationAlameda4.7427%Contra Costa1.8032%Fresno2.6855%Kern1.7083%Lake0.1826%Los Angeles43.8057% Mendocino0.2664%Merced0.7244%Monterey1.2937%Orange5.1382%Placer0.3697%Riverside3.1828%Sacramento3.2922%San Bernardino3.7972%San Diego5.9971%San Francisco5.3898%San Joaquin1.7413%San Luis Obispo0.8096%San Mateo1.4582%Santa Barbara0.7918%Santa Clara5.2450%Santa Cruz0.7709%Stanislaus1.2793%Tulare1.3768%Ventura1.5472%Yolo0.6004%

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1331, Sec. 9.   Effective October 2, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

16941.1.

For the 1991–92 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, any county that elects to participate in the County Medical Services Program pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 16809 shall have the amounts allocated to that county pursuant to this chapter transferred as follows:

(a) Of the moneys allocated from the Hospital Services Account pursuant to Section 16943, seven-seventeenths of the transferable amount shall be transferred to the Rural Health Services Account
 for hospital services governed by Section 16932. The remainder of this amount shall be transferred to the County Medical Services Program Account and shall be utilized for the purposes specified in Section 16809.5.

(b) Of the moneys allocated from the Physician Services Account pursuant to Section 16950, seven-seventeenths of the transferable amount shall be transferred to the Rural Health Services Account for physician services governed by Section 16933. The remainder of this amount shall be transferred to the County Medical Services Program Account and shall be utilized for the purposes specified in Section 16809.5.

(c) Of the moneys allocated from the Unallocated Account governed by Section 16960, seven-seventeenths of the transferable amount shall be transferred to the Rural Health Services Account for other health services governed by the provisions of Section 16933. The
 remainder of this amount shall be transferred to the County Medical Services Program Account and shall be utilized for the purposes specified in Section 16809.5.

(d) Funds transferred pursuant to this section shall be subject to all applicable statutes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 195, Sec. 41.   Effective July 12, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

16942.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that funds appropriated for the purposes of this chapter be administered, to the extent possible, in the same manner and according to same conditions and requirements as funds accounted for pursuant to Part 4.6 (commencing with Section 16800.5). The requirements of Sections 16804.1 and 16818 apply to services supported by funds appropriated for the purposes of this chapter.

(b) Except as specifically provided in this chapter, the
 authority of each county established pursuant to Section 16817 shall remain unaffected.

(c) Services, associated costs, and socio-demographic characteristics of persons served by each county under Section 17000 and supported in whole or in part by funds appropriated pursuant to this chapter shall be incorporated into the information required pursuant to Section 16915.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 195, Sec. 42.   Effective July 12, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Hospital Services [16943. - 16949.]

16943.

(a) Of those allocations made pursuant to Section 16941 for the 1989–90 fiscal year, 59.5 percent shall be used to support uncompensated services provided by county and noncounty hospitals. 

(b) For allocations under Section 16941 for the 1990–91 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, the department shall establish that percentage of the total fiscal year appropriation to the CHIP Account which derives from the Hospital Services Account of the fund. 

(c) The percentages established in subdivisions (a) and (b), when applied to the amount of each MISP county’s annual allocation pursuant to Section 16941, constitute the minimum amount of the allocation which is reserved for payment or support of uncompensated services provided by hospitals licensed pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code. 

(d) The amount of funds calculated in subdivision (c) shall be referred to as the hospital services funding portion of each county’s allocation made pursuant to Section 16941.

(e) (1) For purposes of calculating county and noncounty hospital allocations pursuant to this article for the 1991–92 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, the sum of eighteen million dollars ($18,000,000) shall be added proportionately to each
 county’s hospital services funding allocation calculated in subdivision (c). 

(2) The amount added pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be distributed within each county’s allocation according to subdivisions (a), (b), and (c) of Section 16946. 

(f) (1) For purposes of calculating county and hospital allocations pursuant to this article for the 1991–92 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, the sum of one million six hundred fifty thousand dollars ($1,650,000) shall be added proportionately to the allocations calculated in subdivision (c) for each county with no county hospital. 

(2) The share for each county with no county hospital of the amount specified in paragraph (1) shall be determined by dividing the county’s allocation calculated pursuant to subdivisions (c) and (e) by the total of all
 allocations for counties with no county hospital times the sum of one million six hundred fifty thousand dollars ($1,650,000).

(3) The amounts added pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2) shall be divided into two equal amounts. 

(A) The first amount shall be allocated to each eligible noncounty hospital within a county pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 16946. 

(B) The second amount shall be distributed to eligible hospitals pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 16946. 

(4) In future fiscal years, the amount specified in paragraph (1) shall be adjusted proportionately to reflect any augmentation or reduction in funding available for this article pursuant to Section 43 of Chapter 278 of the Statutes of
 1991.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1170, Sec. 27.   Effective October 14, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

16945.

(a) The department shall annually verify and transmit to each MISP county and each CMSP county the figures specified in subdivision (c), using data supplied by the office.

(b) (1) For purposes specified in subdivision (c), the office shall use data from the quarterly reports required by Section 128740 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) For the 1989–90 fiscal year computations, the office
 shall use the 1988 calendar year data, as adjusted by the office, existing on the statewide file on September 1, 1989.

(3) For the computations for fiscal years after the 1989–90 fiscal year, the office shall use the data from the quarterly reports for the calendar year preceding the computational fiscal year, as adjusted by the office, existing on the statewide file on April 15 immediately preceding the computational fiscal year.

(4) (A) Except as provided in subparagraphs (B), (C), and (D), the definitions, procedures, and data elements specified in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 16920) shall be used in all computations required in subdivision (c).

(B) For the 1991–92 fiscal year, the following definitions shall be used in all computations required in subdivision (c):

(i) “Uncompensated care charges” means the sum of the charges related to patients falling within the charity-other category in the 1990 calendar year and 25 percent of the charges related to patients falling within the bad debts category in the first two quarters of the 1990 calendar year, as both categories of charges are reported quarterly to the office pursuant to Section 128740 of the Health and Safety Code.

(ii) “Uncompensated care costs” means that amount calculated by applying an overall hospital cost-to-charge ratio, calculated by dividing gross operating expenses by gross inpatient and outpatient revenue, as reported quarterly to the office, to uncompensated care charges.

(C) For the 1992–93 fiscal year, the following definitions shall be used in all computations required in subdivision (c):

(i) “Uncompensated care charges” means the charges related to patients falling within charity-other, as reported quarterly to the office pursuant to Section 128740 of the Health and Safety Code.

(ii) “Uncompensated care costs” means that amount calculated by applying an overall hospital cost-to-charge ratio, calculated by dividing gross operating expenses by gross inpatient and outpatient revenue, as reported quarterly to the office, to uncompensated care charges.

(D) For the 1993–94, 1994–95, 1995–96, 1996–97 and subsequent fiscal years, the following definitions shall be used in all computations required in subdivision (c):

(i) (I) For county hospitals and for all hospitals operating in counties with no county hospital,
 “uncompensated care charges” means the charges related to patients falling within charity-other, gross inpatient revenue-county indigent programs and gross outpatient revenue-county indigent programs, as reported quarterly to the office pursuant to Section 128740 of the Health and Safety Code.

(II) For noncounty hospitals operating in a county with a county hospital, “uncompensated care charges” means the charges related to patients falling within charity-other and county indigent programs contractual adjustments, as reported quarterly to the office pursuant to Section 128740 of the Health and Safety Code.

(ii) “Uncompensated care costs” means that amount calculated by applying an overall hospital cost-to-charge ratio, calculated by dividing gross operating expenses less other operating revenue by gross inpatient and outpatient revenue, as reported quarterly to the office, to
 uncompensated care charges.

(c) The office shall compute the following data on uncompensated care costs reported by hospitals located within each MISP county and each CMSP county:

(1) The sum of uncompensated care costs for all hospitals.

(2) The sum of uncompensated care costs for all noncounty hospitals.

(3) The sum of uncompensated care costs for all county hospitals.

(4) The uncompensated care costs of each hospital within the county.

(5) The percentage derived from dividing the result of paragraph (2) by the result of paragraph (1).

(6) The percentage
 derived from dividing the result of paragraph (3) by the result of paragraph (1).

(7) The percentage for each individual hospital derived from dividing each noncounty hospital’s uncompensated care cost in paragraph (4) by the amount in paragraph (2).

(d) The office shall transmit to the department the data specified in subdivision (c) within 30 days of the dates specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) and paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 294, Sec. 81.   Effective August 18, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

16946.

(a) The Hospital Services Account portion of each county’s allocation pursuant to Sections 16932 and 16941 shall be divided into two amounts by:

(1) Multiplying the Hospital Services Account funding portion by the percentage specified in paragraph (5) of subdivision (c) of Section 16945.

(2) Multiplying the amount of the Hospital Services Account funding portion by the percentage specified in paragraph (6) of
 subdivision (c) of Section 16945.

(b) The amount of each county’s Hospital Services Account funding portion calculated in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) shall be used for payment or support of services provided on or after July 1, 1989, by noncounty hospitals. Beginning in the 1991–92 fiscal year and annually thereafter, these amounts shall be reduced by dividing each county’s amount by the total amount for all counties, multiplied by the sum of twelve million dollars ($12,000,000). This amount for each county shall be further divided into two equal parts, as follows:

(1) (A) The first part shall be allocated to each noncounty hospital within a county in amounts determined by multiplying the percentages specified in paragraph (7) of subdivision (c) of Section 16945 by the amount of the first part, and may be used for payment or support of services provided
 by noncounty hospitals to any eligible patient treated at any time during the fiscal year of the allocation.

(B) Funds distributed during fiscal years subsequent to the 1989–90 fiscal year shall be accounted for on a quarterly basis.

(C) For the 1989–90 fiscal year, noncounty hospitals shall provide the demographic data specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 16918 on a minimum of 5 percent of patients for whom services are paid for in whole or in part by funds allocated pursuant to this paragraph, in addition to any other requirements specified in Section 16918.

(D) For the 1990–91 fiscal year and fiscal years thereafter, noncounty hospitals shall provide data pursuant to the reporting requirements specified in Section 16918 and shall provide posted and individual notices pursuant to Section 16818
 for the duration of any quarter during which funds allocated pursuant to this paragraph are used.

(E) Amounts calculated pursuant to this paragraph shall not be reduced or utilized to offset the costs of administering the Hospital Services Account. 

(2) (A) (i) The remaining 50 percent of the funds from the Hospital Services Account shall be distributed by the county to hospitals, including those under contract with the county, to maintain access to emergency care and to purchase other necessary hospital services provided during the fiscal year of the allocation.

(ii) In contracting for emergency care with hospitals in neighboring counties, the county shall not impose conditions to accept transfers that it does not impose on hospitals within its own boundaries.

(B) (i) Prior to distributing funds to hospitals, each county shall consult with the hospitals and consider the historic and projected patterns of care provided by hospitals, by geographic catchment areas within both urban and nonurban areas, unique costs associated with treating disproportionate numbers of severely ill indigent patients, and disproportionate losses sustained by hospitals in the provision of care.

(ii) The county shall also consider the patterns of care of its residents provided by Level I trauma care hospitals in contiguous counties and may make proportionate allocations to those trauma centers. 

(c) (1) The amount of each county’s Hospital Services Account funding portion calculated in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) may be used for the payment or support
 of services provided in county hospitals or noncounty hospitals as determined by each county during the fiscal year of the allocation.

(2) Beginning in the 1991–92 fiscal year and annually thereafter, the amount of each county’s funding portion calculated pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) shall be reduced by an amount that shall be calculated as follows:

(A) Divide each county’s amount of funding under paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) by the total amount of funding under that paragraph for all counties.

(B) Multiply the quotient calculated pursuant to subparagraph (A) by the sum of six million dollars ($6,000,000).

(d) As a condition of receiving funds under this section and Section 16932, each county shall require each county and noncounty
 hospital to do all of the following:

(1) (A) Maintain the same number and classification of emergency room permits and trauma facility designations as existed on January 1, 1990.

(B) (i) Any hospital that maintained two special permits for basic emergency service on the effective date of this part shall be deemed to have met the requirements of paragraph (1) of subdivision (d), if each of the emergency rooms was located on separate campuses of the hospital and was located not more than two miles from the other emergency room.

(ii) Clause (i) shall apply even if one of the emergency room permits is surrendered after the effective date of this part.

(2) Provide data and reports on the use and expenditure of all
 funds received. This information shall be in a form and according to procedures specified by the county and the department.

(3) Assure that funds received pursuant to this section are used only for services for persons who cannot afford to pay for those services, and for whom payment will not be made through any private coverage or by any program funded in whole or in part by the federal government.

(e) (1) If a county or noncounty hospital does not comply with this section, the county shall recover funds received by the hospital as follows:

(A) For any violation of paragraph (1) of subdivision (d), the county shall recover that portion of the funds received which equal the ratio of the number of months not in compliance to 12 months.

(B) For any violation of paragraph (2) of subdivision (d), the county shall recover all funds received.

(C) For any violation of paragraph (3) of subdivision (d), the county shall recover the difference between the amount received and the amount for which the hospital can document that the funds were used only for services for persons who cannot afford to pay for those services and for whom payment will not be made through any private coverage or by any program funded in whole or in part by the federal government.

(2) The county may deny further payments required by this section until the hospital demonstrates compliance.

(f) Funds withheld or recovered pursuant to this section may be reallocated and distributed by the county pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b).

(g) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), funds allocated pursuant to paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (b) which are not expended because a hospital does not participate shall be redistributed pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b).

(2) If no noncounty hospitals remain to participate, the county may distribute those unexpended funds pursuant to subdivision (c).

(h) (1) In any county that comprises not more than one-half percent of the total state population and in which there are a county hospital and a noncounty hospital with emergency room permits located within two miles of each other, the county hospital may surrender its emergency room permit without any penalty for violation of paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) if, in the alternative, all of the following
 occur:

(A) The county shall enter into a contractual arrangement with the noncounty hospital.

(B) The county and noncounty hospital shall provide for the availability of at least the same level of emergency services and specialty backup which the county hospital and noncounty hospital provided prior to the surrendering of the emergency room permit.

(C) The county shall establish sufficient capacity, including evening and weekend coverage, in its urgent care clinic and other outpatient clinics to provide for the same or greater level of urgent care and nonemergency visits that were provided in the county hospital emergency department in the calendar year prior to the surrendering of the emergency room permit.

(D) The county shall provide for adequate
 initial public hearings and ongoing public notification and information, in Spanish and English, on the availability of emergency, urgent care, and nonurgent clinic services and how to obtain those services. The county shall provide for, as part of the ongoing public notification, an outreach program to ensure that the medically indigent community, particularly migrant and seasonal farmworkers, and cultural and linguistic minority patients, are effectively made aware of the alternative system of care and the ways to access it.

(E) The county ensures that there are adequate Spanish translation services and referral services on a 24-hour basis at the noncounty hospital emergency department, and at the county hospital clinics, during their hours of operation.

(F) The county shall ensure, in planning for an alternative delivery system as provided for in paragraph (C), participation of
 those existing agencies providing health care services to the uninsured and working poor medically indigent, including federally qualified health centers and nonprofit community-based rural health clinics.

(G) The county shall ensure that its alternative delivery system includes medical providers who are culturally and linguistically competent to service the diverse medically indigent populations and have been serving uninsured persons seeking care at the county hospital prior to closing. These providers shall include, among others, nonprofit community-based safety net and traditional providers currently serving both the uninsured and medically indigent populations.

(H) The county shall ensure that its alternative delivery system does not provide less health care services and resources than that being made available to the medically indigent and uninsured prior to the closing of
 the county hospital.

(2) The department shall annually review the county’s compliance with this subdivision. If the department determines that the county is not in compliance with this subdivision, it shall require the county to recover funds and deny further payments pursuant to subdivision (e) until compliance is resumed.

(3) Any county that is permitted under paragraph (1) to surrender its emergency room permit shall continue to fulfill its duties and obligations to provide indigent care according to Section 17000.

(i) Any county of the 20th class or the 24th class that discontinues the provision of acute inpatient care services may surrender its emergency room permit without any penalty for violation of paragraph (1) of subdivision (d), provided that the county shall enter into a contractual arrangement with at
 least one noncounty hospital meeting the requirements of subdivision (d) and all of the requirements of subparagraphs (A) to (H), inclusive, of paragraph (1) of subdivision (h) are met by the county and the contracting noncounty hospital, in which case paragraphs (2) and (3) of subdivision (h) shall apply to that county.

(j) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any county of the 20th class or the 24th class that meets the requirements and conditions of subdivision (i) shall be eligible to receive funds distributed pursuant to any provision of this section equal to that amount received by the county for the fiscal year immediately preceding the year in which it discontinues the provision of acute inpatient care services. The amount calculated pursuant to this subdivision shall be adjusted annually based upon the funding available from the Hospital Services Account in the Cigarette and Tobacco Products Surtax Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 741, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

16947.

(a) Any hospital which receives funds pursuant to this chapter or Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 16930) shall, within 90 days of the receipt of those funds, cease all current and waive all future collection efforts, by itself and by its agents, to obtain any payment from the patient with respect to whom the services funded under this chapter were rendered. 

(b) This section shall not be interpreted or applied so as to prevent the hospital from doing either of the following: 

(1) Seeking demographic, financial, or other information necessary for the patient to qualify for Medi-Cal program benefits under Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 14000) of Part 3 or for the reimbursement for services through any other third-party payer. 

(2) (A) Seeking payment from a responsible third-party payer or, subject to subparagraph (B), continuing collection on a repayment schedule for the cost of services rendered. 

(B) Collection on a repayment schedule shall be based on the patient’s ability to pay.

(c) If a hospital receives payment from a patient or responsible third-party payer, the hospital shall notify the county and reimburse the county in an amount equal to the amount collected from the patient or third-party
 payer, but not more than the amount of the payment received from the county for the patient’s care.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 278, Sec. 18.5.   Effective July 30, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

16948.

(a) Commencing with the 1990–91 fiscal year, within 10 working days of receipt of funds allocated pursuant to Section 16941 and Section 16932, the county shall distribute to each noncounty hospital that hospital’s share of the funds pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 16946.

(b) Each noncounty hospital which receives funds pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 16946 shall report to the county within 30 days after the receipt of the funds,
 information on patients for whom the distributions were used, pursuant to Section 16918.

(c) The county shall suspend distribution of funds to any noncounty hospital which fails to provide the information required pursuant to subdivision (b) until the hospital provides the required information.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 195, Sec. 44.   Effective July 12, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

16949.

(a) The Legislature recognizes that in the context of hospital services rendered as a result of emergency medical conditions, the application of the supplemental services requirement of Section 30125 of the Revenue and Taxation Code and Section 13 of Chapter 1331 of the Statutes of 1989 includes certain unique considerations, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Hospital emergency room patient loads generally are not controlled by the facility.

(2) The facility is obligated, as a condition of licensure, to take all patients in need of emergency treatment, if it is within the capacity of the facility to do so.

(3) It is the policy of the Legislature to provide less expensive alternative methods of care, rather than continue present patterns of overutilization of emergency facilities.

(b) Hospitals which provide appropriate treatment to patients who present in the emergency department and which do not impose any barriers to patients’ receipt of that treatment shall be deemed to satisfy the requirements of Section 30125 of the Revenue and Taxation Code and Section 13 of Chapter 1331 of the Statutes of 1989.

(c) Each county, as part of its plan for distribution of funds under paragraph (2) of
 subdivision (b) of Section 16946, shall consider the use of those funds to meet emergency room patient needs and followup treatment, including the need for special hospital services.

(d) Any hospital which contracts with a county under paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 16946 shall report to the county and to the office on any reduction in hospital emergency room specialist capability below the level which was provided at that facility on October 2, 1989.

(e) This section shall not be construed to alter or amend any hospital’s obligation under Sections 1317 to 1317.9a, inclusive, of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 51, Sec. 35.5.   Effective April 18, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Physician Services [16950. - 16950.1.]

16950.

(a) Twelve and two-tenths percent, or that portion of the CHIP Account derived from the Physician Services Account in a fiscal year, of each county’s allocation under Section 16941 shall be used for the support of or payment for uncompensated physician services.
